Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.040

Waiver of court costs.

The courts shall waive court costs and filing fees in any proceeding in which an incapacitated person is receiving *public guardianship services funded under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 364 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 2.72.010 was amended by 2020 c 312 s 402, deleting the definition of "public guardianship services," effective January 1, 2022.